Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.130

Public nuisance defined.

A public nuisance is one which affects equally the rights of an entire community or neighborhood, although the extent of the damage may be unequal.

[Code 1881 s 1236; 1875 p 79 s 2; RRS s 9912.]

NOTES:

Crimes, nuisances: Chapter 9.66 RCW.